Maryland, session 2025, HB0503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Local jurisdiction” means a county or municipal corporation and the territory
within which its powers may be exercised.
1–401.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to charter
counties.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(1) this subtitle, including Parts II and III (Charter county –
Comprehensive plans);
(2) § 1–101(l), (m), and (o) (Definitions – “Plan”, “Priority funding area”,
and “Sensitive area”);

HOUSE BILL 503 3
(3) § 1–201 (Visions);
(4) § 1–206 (Required education);
(5) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(6) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(7) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 5 (Growth Tiers);
(9) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle Parking);
(10) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(11) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
(12) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(13) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);
(14) § 4–212 (Agritourism);
(15) § 4–213 (Alcohol production);
(16) § 4–214 (Agricultural alcohol production);
(17) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(18) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
(19) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);
(20) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
(21) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
(22) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title 7,
Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
(23) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
(24) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
(25) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);

HOUSE BILL 503
(26) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County
Provisions – Baltimore County);
(27) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
(28) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County
Provisions – Howard County);
(29) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County
Provisions – Talbot County); [and]
(30) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty); AND
(31) TITLE 12 (REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP)
(HOUSING DEVELOPMENT ACT).
(c) This section supersedes any inconsistent provision of Division II of this article.
10–103.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to Baltimore
City.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to Baltimore City:
(1) this title;
(2) § 1–101(m) (Definitions – “Priority funding area”);
(3) § 1–101(o) (Definitions – “Sensitive area”);
(4) § 1–201 (Visions);
(5) § 1–206 (Required education);
(6) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(7) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(9) Title 1, Subtitle 4, Parts II and III (Home Rule Counties –
Comprehensive Plans; Implementation);
(10) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);

HOUSE BILL 503 5
(11) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(12) § 4–205 (Administrative adjustments);
(13) § 4–207 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
(14) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(15) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);
(16) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(17) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
(18) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
(19) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
(20) Title 7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities
Agreements);
(21) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
(22) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability); [and]
(23) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty); AND
(24) TITLE 12 (REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP)
(HOUSING DEVELOPMENT ACT).
TITLE 12. REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP.
SUBTITLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS.
12–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO” MEANS THE TOTAL NUMBER OF JOBS BY
PLACE OF WORK DIVIDED BY THE TOTAL NUMBER OF HOUSING UNITS.
(C) “LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP” MEANS THE SHARE OF A
REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP APPORTIONED TO A LOCAL
JURISDICTION UNDER § 12–201(B) OF THIS TITLE.

HOUSE BILL 503
(D) “REGION” MEANS AN AREA DESIGNATED UNDER § 12–102 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(E) “REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP” MEANS THE NUMBER OF
HOUSING UNITS NEEDED FOR A REGION’S JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO TO BE BELOW
1.5 ACCORDING TO THE CALCULATION MADE UNDER § 12–201(A) OF THIS TITLE.
12–102.
FOR PURPOSES OF THIS TITLE, REGIONS ARE DESIGNATED AS FOLLOWS:
(1) THE BALTIMORE REGION INCLUDES ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY,
BALTIMORE COUNTY, CARROLL COUNTY, HARFORD COUNTY, HOWARD COUNTY,
AND BALTIMORE CITY;
(2) THE WASHINGTON SUBURBAN REGION INCLUDES FREDERICK
COUNTY, MONTGOMERY COUNTY, AND PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;
(3) THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION INCLUDES CALVERT
COUNTY, CHARLES COUNTY, AND ST. MARY’S COUNTY;
(4) THE WESTERN MARYLAND REGION INCLUDES ALLEGANY
COUNTY, GARRETT COUNTY, AND WASHINGTON COUNTY;
(5) THE UPPER EASTERN SHORE REGION INCLUDES CAROLINE
COUNTY, CECIL COUNTY, KENT COUNTY, QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY, AND TALBOT
COUNTY; AND
(6) THE LOWER EASTERN SHORE REGION INCLUDES DORCHESTER
COUNTY, SOMERSET COUNTY, WICOMICO COUNTY, AND WORCESTER COUNTY.
SUBTITLE 2. REQUIREMENTS.
12–201.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL
PUBLISH, FOR EACH REGION DESIGNATED UNDER § 12–102 OF THIS TITLE:
(1) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF HOUSING UNITS;
(2) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF JOBS BY PLACE OF WORK;
(3) THE JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO;

HOUSE BILL 503 7
(4) THE NUMBER OF HOUSING UNITS NEEDED TO BE PRODUCED FOR
THE REGION TO REACH A JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO OF 1.5 OR LESS; AND
(5) THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE EXISTING NUMBER OF HOUSING
UNITS AND THE NUMBER OF HOUSING UNITS NEEDED FOR THE REGION TO REACH A
JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO OF 1.5 OR LESS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AND
THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL APPORTION A REGIONAL HOUSING
INFRASTRUCTURE GAP TO:
(1) EACH COUNTY BASED ON THE SHARE OF REGIONAL JOBS
LOCATED IN THE COUNTY; AND
(2) EACH INCORPORATED MUNICIPALITY BASED ON THE SHARE OF
REGIONAL JOBS LOCATED IN THE MUNICIPALITY.
12–202.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AFFORDABLE” MEANS THAT HOUSING COSTS DO NOT EXCEED
30% OF A HOUSEHOLD’S INCOME.
(3) “AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT” MEANS A DWELLING UNIT THAT IS
DEED–RESTRICTED TO BE AFFORDABLE TO A HOUSEHOLD EARNING 60% OR LESS
OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 40 YEARS.
(4) “AREA MEDIAN INCOME” MEANS THE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD
INCOME FOR THE AREA ADJUSTED FOR HOUSEHOLD SIZE AS PUBLISHED AND
ANNUALLY UPDATED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT.
(5) “HOUSING UNIT BUILT” MEANS A NEWLY CONSTRUCTED OR
SUBSTANTIALLY RENOVATED RESIDENTIAL DWELLING UNIT THAT HAS RECEIVED A
USE AND OCCUPANCY PERMIT FROM A LOCAL JURISDICTION ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2026.
(6) (I) “RAIL STATION” MEANS A PRESENT OR PLANNED:
1. MARC STATION ALONG THE PENN, CAMDEN, OR
BRUNSWICK LINES;

HOUSE BILL 503
2. BALTIMORE METRO SUBWAYLINK STATION;
3. BALTIMORE LIGHT RAILLINK STATION;
4. METRORAIL SYSTEM STATION; OR
5. ANY OTHER PASSENGER RAIL STATION.
(II) A RAIL STATION SHALL BE CONSIDERED “PLANNED” IF IT IS
ON A FINALIZED RAIL ROUTE WITH COMPLETED DEVELOPMENT APPROVALS.
(B) (1) THE NUMBER OF UNITS IN THE LOCAL HOUSING
INFRASTRUCTURE GAP MAY BE REDUCED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) FOR EVERY 1 HOUSING UNIT BUILT WITHIN THREE–QUARTERS OF
A MILE OF A RAIL STATION, 1.5 HOUSING UNITS MAY BE SUBTRACTED FROM THE
LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP.
(3) FOR EVERY 1 AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT BUILT, 1.5 HOUSING
UNITS MAY BE SUBTRACTED FROM THE LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP.
(C) CALCULATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE
COMBINED TO SUBTRACT MORE THAN 1.5 HOUSING UNITS FROM THE LOCAL
HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP PER 1 HOUSING UNIT BUILT.
(D) (1) IN ORDER TO REDUCE A LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL SUBMIT
DOCUMENTATION TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT.
(2) A SUBMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE IN THE FORM AND MANNER THAT THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT REQUIRES.
12–203.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AREA WITH INADEQUATE WATER OR WASTEWATER FACILITIES”
MEANS:

HOUSE BILL 503 9
(I) AN AREA OUTSIDE AN EXISTING OR PLANNED WATER AND
SEWER SERVICE AREA AS IDENTIFIED IN AN ADOPTED COUNTY PLAN UNDER TITLE
9, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; OR
(II) AN AREA INSIDE AN EXISTING OR PLANNED WATER AND
SEWER SERVICE AREA AS IDENTIFIED IN AN ADOPTED COUNTY PLAN UNDER TITLE
9, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, WHERE THE CONNECTING WATER
OR WASTEWATER FACILITY:
1. DOES NOT HAVE ADEQUATE CAPACITY OR IS ABOVE
80% CAPACITY; AND
2. DOES NOT HAVE A CAPACITY MANAGEMENT PLAN
APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT.
(3) “AREA ZONED FOR HEAVY INDUSTRIAL USE” MEANS AN AREA
THAT:
(I) DOES NOT ALLOW RESIDENTIAL USES; AND
(II) ALLOWS FOR INTENSE INDUSTRIAL ACTIVITIES, SUCH AS
HEAVY MANUFACTURING, ASSEMBLING, OR INDUSTRIAL PROCESSING ACTIVITIES,
THAT MAY CREATE SIGNIFICANT NOISE, DUST, VIBRATION, GLARE, ODORS, AND
OTHER ADVERSE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS.
(4) “CURRENT OR PROJECTED FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT” MEANS:
(I) A SCHOOL’S FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT AT THE TIME OF THE
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT APPLICATION; OR
(II) A SCHOOL’S PROJECTED FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT FOR A
SCHOOL YEAR NOT LATER THAN THE 7TH FULL SCHOOL YEAR AFTER THE TIME OF
THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION.
(5) “DENY A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION”
INCLUDES TO:
(I) DENY A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION AT
ANY STATE IN THE DEVELOPMENT PROCESS, INCLUDING ANY REQUIRED LAND USE
APPROVALS OR ENTITLEMENTS NECESSARY FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A BUILDING
PERMIT; AND
(II) REQUIRE THAT A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT WAIT A
PERIOD OF 1 OR MORE YEARS TO RECEIVE A BUILDING PERMIT.

HOUSE BILL 503
(6) “GEOGRAPHICALLY ADJACENT SCHOOL” MEANS A SCHOOL THAT:
(I) IS OF THE SAME GRADE CONFIGURATION OR SHARES GRADE
BAND OVERLAP; AND
(II) HAS AN ATTENDANCE AREA GEOGRAPHICALLY
CONTIGUOUS TO THE SCHOOL ATTENDANCE AREA IN WHICH THE HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IS LOCATED.
(7) “HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT” MEANS THE NEW
CONSTRUCTION OR SUBSTANTIAL RENOVATION OF A RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE
PROJECT.
(8) “HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION” MEANS AN
APPLICATION FOR A BUILDING PERMIT, A VARIANCE, A WAIVER, A CONDITIONAL USE
PERMIT, A SPECIAL PERMIT, A CERTIFICATION, AN AUTHORIZATION, A SITE PLAN
APPROVAL, A SUBDIVISION APPROVAL, OR ANY OTHER DETERMINATION BY A LOCAL
JURISDICTION RELATING TO A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
(9) “OBJECTIVE WRITTEN DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS” MEANS
OBJECTIVE, QUANTIFIABLE, WRITTEN DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS, CONDITIONS,
AND POLICIES THAT ARE:
(I) NOT SUBJECT TO PERSONAL OR SUBJECTIVE JUDGMENT BY
A PUBLIC OFFICIAL;
(II) UNIFORMLY VERIFIABLE BY REFERENCE TO AN EXTERNAL
AND UNIFORM BENCHMARK OR CRITERION AVAILABLE AND KNOWABLE BY THE
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICANT; AND
(III) APPLIED TO FACILITATE AND ACCOMMODATE
DEVELOPMENT AT THE DENSITY PERMITTED ON THE SITE.
(10) “SCHOOL ATTENDANCE AREA” MEANS THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA
THAT CONTAINS THE RESIDENCES OF THE STUDENT POPULATION TO BE SERVED, AS
DESIGNATED BY A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
4–109(C) OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(11) “SPECIFIC ADVERSE IMPACT” MEANS A SIGNIFICANT,
QUANTIFIABLE, DIRECT, AND UNAVOIDABLE IMPACT, BASED ON OBJECTIVE,
IDENTIFIED WRITTEN PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY STANDARDS, POLICIES, OR
CONDITIONS.

HOUSE BILL 503 11
(12) “STATE RATED CAPACITY” MEANS THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS
THAT AN INDIVIDUAL SCHOOL HAS THE PHYSICAL CAPACITY TO ENROLL, AS
CALCULATED UNDER A FORMULA ADOPTED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION.
(13) “SUBSTANTIAL RENOVATION” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL REAL
ESTATE PROJECT THAT MEETS CRITERIA AS ANNUALLY ESTABLISHED AND
IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
IN THE MULTIFAMILY RENTAL FINANCING PROGRAM GUIDE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT HAS A
LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP GREATER THAN ZERO UNITS.
(C) A LOCAL JURISDICTION HAS AN AFFIRMATIVE OBLIGATION TO
EXPEDITIOUSLY APPROVE A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION.
(D) A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT DENY A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT WITHOUT A JUSTIFICATION THAT:
(1) CLEARLY OUTWEIGHS THE NEED FOR HOUSING; AND
(2) IS SUPPORTED BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE.
(E) A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL CITE AT LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
AS A JUSTIFICATION TO DENY A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION
THAT CLEARLY OUTWEIGHS THE NEED FOR HOUSING:
(1) (I) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT AS PROPOSED
WOULD HAVE A SPECIFIC ADVERSE IMPACT ON THE PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY TO
THE RESIDENTS THAT WOULD LIVE IN THE PROJECT; AND
(II) THERE IS NO FEASIBLE METHOD TO SATISFACTORILY
MITIGATE OR AVOID THE SPECIFIC ADVERSE IMPACT WITHOUT RENDERING THE
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT FINANCIALLY INFEASIBLE;
(2) (I) THE DENIAL OF THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT
APPLICATION OR IMPOSITION OF CONDITIONS IS REQUIRED IN ORDER TO COMPLY
WITH SPECIFIC STATE OR FEDERAL LAW; AND
(II) THERE IS NO FEASIBLE METHOD TO COMPLY WITHOUT
RENDERING THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT FINANCIALLY INFEASIBLE;

HOUSE BILL 503
(3) (I) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IS LOCATED IN AN
AREA WITH INADEQUATE WATER OR WASTEWATER FACILITIES TO SERVE THE
PROJECT; AND
(II) THERE IS NO FEASIBLE METHOD TO SERVICE THE HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT WITH WATER OR WASTEWATER FACILITIES;
(4) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IS LOCATED AT THE TIME
OF THE APPLICATION:
(I) IN AN AREA ZONED FOR HEAVY INDUSTRIAL USE;
(II) ON CONSERVATION PROPERTY, AS DEFINED IN § 8–209.1 OF
THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE; OR
(III) ON AGRICULTURAL LAND, AS DEFINED IN § 9–206 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE;
(5) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IS LOCATED, AT THE TIME
OF APPLICATION, IN A SCHOOL ATTENDANCE AREA:
(I) THAT HAS UNIFORMLY VERIFIABLE CURRENT OR
PROJECTED FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT FOR THE SCHOOL THAT EXCEEDS 100% OF
THE SCHOOL’S CURRENT OR ESTIMATED STATE RATED CAPACITY;
(II) FOR WHICH THE SUM OF THE UNIFORMLY VERIFIABLE
CURRENT OR PROJECTED FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT FOR THE SCHOOL AND ITS
GEOGRAPHICALLY ADJACENT SCHOOLS EXCEEDS 100% OF THE SUM OF THE
CURRENT OR ESTIMATED STATE RATED CAPACITY FOR THOSE SCHOOLS; AND
(III) THAT HAS BEEN DETERMINED BY THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION, USING UNIFORMLY VERIFIABLE OBJECTIVE CRITERIA, TO HAVE
INADEQUATE SCHOOL CAPACITY; OR
(6) (I) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT DOES NOT COMPLY
WITH OBJECTIVE WRITTEN DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS AT THE TIME OF
APPLICATION SUBMISSION; AND
(II) THERE IS NO FEASIBLE METHOD TO COMPLY WITHOUT
RENDERING THE DEVELOPMENT FINANCIALLY INFEASIBLE.
(F) IF A LOCAL JURISDICTION DENIES A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT
APPLICATION, THE LOCAL JURISDICTION MUST PROVIDE IN WRITING THE REASON

HOUSE BILL 503 13
FOR DENIAL, SPECIFYING HOW THE DENIAL COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTIONS (C)
THROUGH (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) (1) THE PROPONENT OF A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT MAY
BRING AN ACTION IN THE APPROPRIATE CIRCUIT COURT TO ENFORCE THIS
SECTION.
(2) (I) IF A COURT FINDS THAT A LOCAL JURISDICTION DENIED A
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION,
THE COURT SHALL ISSUE AN ORDER OR A JUDGMENT COMPELLING THE
JURISDICTION TO COMPLY WITHIN 90 DAYS WITH THIS SECTION.
(II) AN ORDER OR A JUDGMENT COMPELLING COMPLIANCE
UNDER THIS SECTION MAY INCLUDE AN ORDER OR A JUDGMENT:
1. REQUIRING THE LOCAL JURISDICTION TO TAKE
ACTION ON THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT; OR
2. DIRECTING THE LOCAL JURISDICTION TO APPROVE
THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
(3) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT ITS ORDER OR JUDGMENT HAS
NOT BEEN CARRIED OUT WITHIN 90 DAYS, THE COURT MAY ISSUE FURTHER ORDERS
TO ENSURE THAT THE PURPOSES AND POLICIES OF THIS SECTION ARE FULFILLED.
TITLE 12. HOUSING DEVELOPMENT ACT.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS.
12–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND
PLANNING COMMISSION.
(C) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
SUBTITLE 2. HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS.
12–201.

HOUSE BILL 503
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 10 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS FOR:
(1) THE STATE;
(2) EACH COUNTY; AND
(3) EACH MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT EXERCISES ZONING OR
PLANNING AUTHORITY.
(B) IN ESTABLISHING THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ANALYZE DATA AND FORECASTS RELATED TO:
(I) EMPLOYMENT DEMAND;
(II) HOUSING DEMAND;
(III) POPULATION GROWTH; OR
(IV) ANY OTHER RELATED INFORMATION;
(2) CONSULT WITH EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT MAY HAVE
HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(3) CONSULT WITH THE COMMISSION ABOUT HOUSING PRODUCTION
TARGETS THAT MAY BE ESTABLISHED WITHIN ITS JURISDICTION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REEVALUATE AND REVISE THE ESTABLISHED
HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS USING INFORMATION RECEIVED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH THE CURRENT HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGETS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE AND NOTIFY THE COMMISSION AND EACH APPLICABLE LOCAL
JURISDICTION OF THE TARGETS IN A TIMELY MANNER.
(2) THE PUBLICATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PROVIDE A
SUPPORTING BASIS FOR THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS THAT ARE
ESTABLISHED.

HOUSE BILL 503 15
(3) WITHIN 1 MONTH AFTER THE PUBLICATION OF HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGETS, AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE INFORMATION PUBLISHED
REGARDING HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY.
12–202.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH
YEAR THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH A REPORT BASED ON THE
HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–201 OF THIS SUBTITLE
THAT:
(1) IDENTIFIES THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS FOR THE STATE
AND EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION;
(2) ASSESSES THE PROGRESS OF THE STATE AND EACH LOCAL
JURISDICTION WITH MEETING APPLICABLE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS; AND
(3) PROVIDES A SUPPORTING BASIS FOR ANY ALTERATION TO AN
ESTABLISHED HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER HOUSING PRODUCTION THAT HAS
BEEN APPROVED OR SIMILARLY AUTHORIZED WHEN DETERMINING THE PROGRESS
OF THE STATE OR A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH MEETING APPLICABLE HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGETS UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROVIDE POTENTIAL SOLUTIONS TO ASSIST
THE STATE OR A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH MEETING APPLICABLE HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGETS IN THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH THE REPORT ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE AND NOTIFY EACH APPLICABLE LOCAL JURISDICTION AND
THE COMMISSION OF THE REPORT IN A TIMELY MANNER.
(2) WITHIN 1 MONTH AFTER THE PUBLICATION OF THE REPORT
REQUIRED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SUBMIT THE REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.

HOUSE BILL 503
(E) THE DEPARTMENT IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE A REPORT UNDER
THIS SECTION IN THE SAME YEAR THAT A HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET REPORT
IS REQUIRED UNDER § 12–201 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
12–203.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
SUBTITLE 3. LOCAL REGULATORY PROCEDURES.
12–301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT” MEANS THE NEW CONSTRUCTION
OR SUBSTANTIAL RENOVATION OF A RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT.
(C) “HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION” MEANS AN
APPLICATION FOR A BUILDING PERMIT, A CERTIFICATION, AN AUTHORIZATION, A
SITE PLAN APPROVAL, A SUBDIVISION APPROVAL, A CONCEPTUAL PLAN, OR ANY
OTHER DETERMINATION BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION RELATING
TO A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT THAT HAS BEEN SUBMITTED TO A LOCAL
JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION IN COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE
REQUIREMENTS.
(D) “SUBSTANTIALLY COMPLETE APPLICATION” MEANS AN APPLICATION
THAT SATISFIES A SUBSTANTIAL MAJORITY OF THE APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS,
BUT MAY CONTAIN NONSUBSTANTIVE ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR SIMILAR
INCONSEQUENTIAL DEFICIENCIES.
12–302.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
APPROVAL, CONDITIONAL APPROVAL, OR DENIAL OF A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT APPLICATION BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
GOVERNED ONLY BY THE DULY ADOPTED LAWS AND REGULATIONS IN EFFECT WHEN
THE COMPLETE APPLICATION OR SUBSTANTIALLY COMPLETE APPLICATION WAS
SUBMITTED.
(2) (I) IF A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION PROVIDES
FOR THE APPROVAL OF A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IN MULTIPLE STAGES,
THE DATE OF A COMPLETE APPLICATION OR SUBSTANTIALLY COMPLETE
APPLICATION SUBMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE

HOUSE BILL 503 17
THE DATE OF THE FIRST COMPLETE APPLICATION OR SUBSTANTIALLY COMPLETE
APPLICATION SUBMISSION FOR ANY PROCESS THAT MAY CULMINATE IN THE FINAL
APPROVAL OF THE APPLICATION.
(II) A ZONING TEXT AMENDMENT, APPLICATION FOR
REZONING, OR OTHER LOCAL EQUIVALENT MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED AS A PROCESS
THAT MAY CULMINATE IN THE FINAL APPROVAL OF AN APPLICATION UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(B) (1) ONCE A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT HAS BEEN APPROVED,
THE PROJECT SHALL HAVE A VESTED RIGHT TO THAT AUTHORIZED USE AND
DEVELOPMENT FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS OR A PERIOD GRANTED BY THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION, WHICHEVER IS LONGER.
(2) A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE
TIME PERIOD OF THE AUTHORIZED USE AND DEVELOPMENT FOR A HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) PREVENT THE EXPIRATION OF AN APPROVAL OF A HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OR
REGULATIONS OF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION; OR
(2) LIMIT THE ABILITY OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE
COMMISSION TO:
(I) APPLY HEALTH AND SAFETY LAWS OR REGULATIONS THAT
ARE NECESSARY TO ADDRESS IMMEDIATE THREATS TO PUBLIC SAFETY;
(II) EXECUTE A DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES
AGREEMENT UNDER TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(III) APPROVE A ZONING TEXT AMENDMENT, APPLICATION FOR
REZONING, OR OTHER LOCAL EQUIVALENT TO INCREASE THE DENSITY OF A
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT BEYOND THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE AMOUNT AT
THE TIME OF COMPLETE APPLICATION OR SUBSTANTIALLY COMPLETE
APPLICATION SUBMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OR (2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION APPLY TO LOCAL
JURISDICTIONS AND THE COMMISSION ONLY TO THE EXTENT THAT THEY DO NOT
CONFLICT WITH A SPECIFIED FEDERAL OR STATE LAW OR REGULATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:

HOUSE BILL 503
(a) There is a Housing Opportunities Made Equitable Commission.
(b) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Planning, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of the Environment, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee; and
(7) the following members, appointed by the Secretary of Housing and
Community Development:
(i) one representative of county government representing rural
communities;
(ii) one representative of county government representing urban or
suburban communities;
(iii) one representative of municipal government representing rural
communities;
(iv) one representative of municipal government representing urban
or suburban communities; and
(v) seven eight representatives who reside in the State and have
extensive knowledge of at least one of the following areas:
1. residential real estate construction;
2. residential real estate development or financing;
3. residential real estate ownership;
4. local government planning and regulations;
4. 5. local permitting and licensing;

HOUSE BILL 503 19
5. 6. environmental engineering;
6. 7. historic preservation; and
7. 8. the housing needs of low–income individuals.
(c) The Governor shall designate a chair from the members of the Commission.
(d) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall provide staff
for the Commission.
(e) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Commission shall:
(1) study and make recommendations on ways the State and local
governments can improve the housing supply and housing affordability; and
(2) identify and assess factors that impact the housing supply and housing
affordability, including:
(i) labor and material costs;
(ii) taxes and fees;
(iii) access to financing and capital investment;
(iv) planning, zoning, and land use regulations;
(v) State building standards;
(vi) appeals and other legal barriers;
(vii) permitting and approval processes;
(viii) the availability of land for housing;
(ix) creating and financing affordable housing; and
(x) infrastructure.

HOUSE BILL 503
(g) On or before July 1, 2026, the Commission shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026 June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.